fi: Taide ja viihde > Harrastukset ja taiteet > Soitin- ja orkesteritarvikkeet > Kosketinsoittimen lisätarvikkeet: Kosketinsoittimen laukut ja kotelot; Kosketinsoittimen telineet; Sustainpedaalit
bg-BG: Изкуства и развлечения > Хобита и творчески изкуства > Аксесоари за музикални инструменти и оркестри > Аксесоари за клавишни инструменти: Чанти и калъфи за клавишни инструменти; Стойки за клавишни инструменти; Педали за поддържане
zh-CN: 艺术与娱乐 > 爱好/艺术创作 > 乐器与管弦乐队配件 > 乐器键盘配件: 乐器键盘包/盒; 键盘乐器架; 延音踏板
pl: Sztuka i rozrywka > Hobby i sztuki piękne > Akcesoria do instrumentów muzycznych > Akcesoria do keyboardów: Torby i futerały na keyboardy; Stojaki na keyboardy; Pedały forte
el: Τέχνες & Ψυχαγωγία > Χόμπι & Δημιουργικές Τέχνες > Αξεσουάρ μουσικών οργάνων & ορχήστρας > Αξεσουάρ για συνθεσάιζερ: Τσάντες & θήκες για συνθεσάιζερ; Βάσεις για συνθεσάιζερ; Πεντάλ συνεχούς ήχου
pt-BR: Artes e entretenimento > Hobbies e artes > Acessórios para instrumentos musicais e orquestras > Acessórios para teclado: Estojos e bolsas para teclado; Suportes para teclado; Pedais de sustentação
sk-SK: Umenie a zábava > Záľuby a tvorivé dielne > Príslušenstvo pre hudobné nástroje > Príslušenstvo pre klávesy: Tašky a puzdrá na klávesy; Stojany na klávesy; Sustain pedále
de: Kunst & Unterhaltung > Hobby & Kunst > Zubehör für Musikinstrumente > Keyboardzubehör: Keyboardtaschen; Keyboardständer; Sustain-Pedale
nl: Kunst en entertainment > Hobby's en creatieve vaardigheden > Accessoires voor muziekinstrumenten > Accessoires voor keyboards: Keyboardhoezen en -tassen; Standaards voor keyboards; Sustainpedalen
hu: Művészet és szórakoztatás > Hobbik és kreatív művészet > Hangszer és zenekari kiegészítők > Zenei billentyűzet kiegészítők: Zeneibillentyűzet-táskák és -tokok; Zeneibillentyűzet-állványok; Fenntartó pedálok
zh-TW: 藝術/娛樂 > 嗜好和創作藝術 > 樂器配件 > 鍵盤琴配件: 樂器鍵盤收納袋/收納箱; 琴架; 延音踏板
tr: Sanat ve Eğlence > Hobiler ve Sanatsal Çalışmalar > Müzik Aleti ve Orkestra Aksesuarları > Klavye Aksesuarları: Müzik Klavye Çantaları ve Kutuları; Klavye Stantları; Yastık Pedalları
it: Arte e svago > Hobby e arti creative > Accessori per orchestre e strumenti musicali > Accessori per tastiera: Custodie e borse per tastiere; Leggii per tastiere; Pedali sustain
ro-RO: Artă și divertisment > Hobby-uri și artă > Accesorii pentru instrumente muzicale și orchestră > Accesorii pentru claviatură muzicală: Genți și huse pentru claviatură muzicală; Suporturi pentru claviaturi; Pedale susținere
da: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og håndarbejde > Musikinstrumenter – tilbehør > Musikkeyboard – tilbehør: Tasker og kasser til keyboards; Musikkeyboard – stativer; Forvrængningspedaler
vi: Nghệ thuật và giải trí > Sở thích và nghệ thuật sáng tạo > Phụ kiện dàn nhạc và nhạc cụ > Phụ kiện nhạc cụ có phím: Túi và giỏ đựng đàn phím; Chân đế đàn organ; Sustain pedal cho đàn
ja: 芸術・エンターテイメント > 趣味・コレクション > 楽器関連用品 > 電子キーボード用品: キーボードケース; キーボードスタンド; サスティンペダル
lt-LT: Menai ir pramogos > Hobiai ir menai > Muzikos instrumentai ir orkestro priedai > Muzikinių klaviatūrų priedai: Muzikinių klaviatūrų krepšiai ir dėklai; Muzikinių klaviatūrų stovai; Išlaikymo pedalai
ru: Искусство и развлечения > Хобби и творчество > Аксессуары для музыкальных инструментов и игры в оркестре > Аксессуары для клавишных инструментов: Сумки и футляры для клавишных инструментов; Стойки для клавишных инструментов; Педали
hr-HR: Umjetnost i zabava > Hobiji i kreativne umjetnosti > Pribor za glazbala i orkestar > Dodaci za klavijature: Torbe i koferi za klavijature; Stalci za klavijature; Pedale za sustain
sv: Konst och underhållning > Hobby och skapande > Tillbehör till musikinstrument > Tillbehör till keyboards: Klaviaturväskor och -lådor; Stativ för keyboards; Dämparpedaler
en: Arts & Entertainment > Hobbies & Creative Arts > Musical Instrument & Orchestra Accessories > Musical Keyboard Accessories: Musical Keyboard Bags & Cases; Musical Keyboard Stands; Sustain Pedals
es: Arte y ocio > Hobbies y artes creativas > Accesorios para instrumentos musicales y de orquesta > Accesorios para teclados: Bolsas y fundas para teclados; Bases para teclados; Pedales de sostenido
ko: 아트/엔터테인먼트 > 취미/예술 > 악기/오케스트라 부대용품 > 건반악기 부대용품: 건반악기 가방/케이스; 키보드 스탠드; 서스테인 페달
pt-PT: Artes e lazer > Passatempos e artes criativas > Acessórios de instrumentos musicais e orquestra > Acessórios de teclado musical: Sacos e estojos de teclado musical; Suportes de teclado musical; Pedais de sustentação
cs: Umění a zábava > Hobby, hudba a výtvarné umění > Hudební nástroje – příslušenství > Klávesové nástroje – příslušenství: Obaly a kufry na klávesnice; Klávesové stojany; Klávesové pedály
fr: Arts et loisirs > Loisirs et arts créatifs > Accessoires pour instruments de musique et orchestres > Accessoires pour instruments à clavier: Étuis et housses pour claviers; Supports pour instruments à clavier; Pédales fortes
sl-SI: Kultura in zabava > Hobiji in ustvarjalne umetnosti > Dodatki za glasbila in orkestre > Dodatki za glasbene klaviature: Torbe in kovčki za glasbene klaviature; Stojala za glasbene klaviature; Sustain pedala
nb: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og kreativitet > Tilbehør til musikkinstrumenter og orkestre > Tilbehør til elektroniske orgler: Vesker og kasser til elektroniske orgler; Stativer til elektroniske orgler; Fortepedaler
th: ศิลปะและความบันเทิง > งานอดิเรกและศิลปะสร้างสรรค์ > เครื่องดนตรีและอุปกรณ์ออร์เคสตรา > อุปกรณ์คีย์บอร์ด: กระเป๋าและที่ใส่คีย์บอร์ด; ขาวางคีย์บอร์ดดนตรี; คันเหยียบเปียโน